California statutes. Family Code
(G) Review the documentation provided by the State Department of Health Care Services pursuant to subdivision (d).

(H) Obtain approval from the director of the department of the child-specific certification for the out-of-state residential facility. Director approval may be given after all of the requirements of subparagraphs (A) to (G), inclusive, have been satisfied.

(3) The department shall not issue a child-specific certification to the out-of-state residential facility if the out-of-state
 residential facility fails to cooperate during the certification process, including failing to provide any of the documentation listed in paragraph (2).

(4) If all the requirements of paragraph (2) have been satisfied, the department shall certify the out-of-state residential facility pursuant to this section. The department shall provide written documentation of this certification to the county placing agency.

(5) The child-specific certification is discontinued, effective immediately, upon the child transitioning out of the out-of-state residential facility’s program.

(d) The licensing standards applicable to out-of-state residential facilities certified by the department, as described in subdivision (c), shall include the licensing standards for mental health program approval described in Section 1562.01 of the
 Health and Safety Code. These standards shall be satisfied if the State Department of Health Care Services determines that the out-of-state residential facility has an equivalent mental health program approval in the state in which it is operating. Upon receipt of a request for the State Department of Health Care Services to determine whether an out-of-state residential facility has an equivalent mental health program approval in the state in which it is operation, the State Department of Health Care Services shall expedite the review of the request in order to determine any additional information needed, shall communicate with the requesting county agency regarding its review including regular status updates, and shall, in a timely manner, make its determination. If an out-of-state residential facility cannot satisfy the licensing standards for an equivalent mental health program approval, the department shall not certify the facility.

(e) Failure by an out-of-state residential facility to make children or staff available as required by subdivision (a) for a private interview or make files available for review shall be grounds to deny or discontinue the certification.

(f) Certifications made pursuant to this section shall be reviewed as often as necessary to ensure the health and safety of children in care. At a minimum, certifications made pursuant to this section shall be reviewed semiannually. The department shall complete a full review of the facility’s program statement semiannually.

(g) (1) The department may deny or discontinue the certification of the out-of-state residential facility if the department makes a finding that the out-of-state residential facility is not operating in compliance with the requirements of this section. The department shall engage with counties
 that have one or more youth at a facility proposed for decertification to allow for a transition to occur, to the extent possible while ensuring the youths’ safety and well-being.

(2) If the out-of-state residential facility disagrees with any decision by the department to deny or discontinue the certification, the out-of-state residential facility may appeal the decision immediately upon receipt of the notice of decertification. If the out-of-state residential facility decides to appeal the decision, the appeal shall be submitted to the department not later than 30 calendar days after the out-of-state residential facility receives the decision. The out-of-state residential facility’s appeal shall be in writing and include all information, including supporting documents, that forms the basis of the appeal. The department shall issue a final determination not later than 30 calendar days after receipt of the appeal. If the out-of-state
 residential facility disagrees with the department’s determination, the out-of-state residential facility may file a writ pursuant to paragraph (3). If the out-of-state residential facility decides to file a writ, the writ shall be filed not later than 30 calendar days after the out-of-state residential facility receives the final determination.

(3) Any judicial proceeding to contest the department’s determination as to the status of the out-of-state residential facility’s certificate shall be held in California pursuant to Section 1085 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(h) The certification requirements of this section shall not impact any of the following:

(1) Placement of emotionally disturbed children made pursuant to an individualized education program developed pursuant to the federal Individuals with
 Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) if the placement is not funded with federal or state foster care funds.

(2) Placement of Indian children, as defined by the Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et. seq.) and Section 224.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(i) Failure by an out-of-state residential facility to obtain or maintain its certification, as required by this section, shall preclude the use of any public funds, whether county, state, or federal, in the payment for the placement of any child in that out-of-state residential facility pursuant to the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children.

(j) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the
 Government Code), the State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Health Care Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, written directives, interim licensing standards, or similar written instructions from the department until regulations are adopted. These all-county letters, written directives, interim licensing standards, or similar written instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 86, Sec. 8.   (AB 153)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

7912.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the health and safety of children placed in out-of-state residential facilities pursuant to the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children is a matter of statewide concern. The Legislature therefore affirms its intention that children placed by a county child welfare
 agency or probation department in out-of-state residential facilities be accorded the same personal rights and safeguards of a child placed in a California licensed short-term residential therapeutic program. This section is in clarification of existing law.

(b) (1) On or before September 1, 2021, and each month thereafter, the department shall report to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature the number of children placed by a county child welfare agency or probation
 department in out-of-state residential facilities pursuant to the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children.

(2) On or before January 1, 2022, and every six months thereafter until facilities are decertified and all children returned to California on or before January 1, 2023, the department, in consultation with the counties, shall report to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature on the capacity for serving all child welfare and probation-supervised foster children within California or in home-based settings outside of the state. The report shall also include all of the following data, as applicable:

(A) The number of children served by
 out-of-state residential facilities, disaggregated by child welfare services agency and probation department supervision.

(B) Data measures related to ongoing transition planning efforts, including child and family team meetings, child-specific recruitment and family finding activities, and multiagency care coordination efforts that occurred for each child before and during placement in the out-of-state residential facility.

(C) The lengths of stay of each child placed in an out-of-state residential facility by a California child welfare agency or probation department.

(D) The total number of all serious incident reports received regarding out-of-state residential facilities, and descriptions of the types of
 incidents reported.

(E) The total number of serious incident reports received regarding California children placed in out-of-state residential facilities, and descriptions of the types of incidents reported.

(3) Reports made pursuant to this subdivision shall not include any demographic data that would permit identification of any child or nonminor dependent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 86, Sec. 9.   (AB 153)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

7913.

(a) When a full service licensed private adoption agency has provided adoption-related services to a birth parent or prospective adoptive parent, that agency is delegated the authority to determine whether the placement shall or shall not be made pursuant to the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children, and to sign the compact forms documenting that determination and date of placement.

(b) For
 children entering California in independent adoptions, prior to making a determination regarding placement and as soon as feasible, the private adoption agency shall notify the appropriate district office or delegated county adoption agency of the matter and verify that the preplacement interview of the prospective adoptive parent or parents has been completed.

(c) This section shall not apply to a child who is a dependent of the court or a child subject to a petition filed under Section 300 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 462, Sec. 5.   (AB 687)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 6. FOSTER CARE PLACEMENT CONSIDERATIONS [7950. - 7952.]

7950.

(a) With full consideration for the proximity of the natural parents to the placement so as to facilitate visitation and family reunification, when a placement in foster care is being made, the following considerations shall be used:

(1) Placement shall, if possible, be made in the home of a relative, unless the placement would not be in the best interest of the child. Diligent efforts shall be made by an agency or entity to which this subdivision applies, to locate an appropriate relative as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 319 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. At a permanency hearing in which the court terminates reunification services, or at a
 postpermanency hearing for a child not placed for adoption, the court shall find that the agency or entity to which this subdivision applies has made diligent efforts to locate an appropriate relative and that each relative whose name has been submitted to the agency or entity as a possible caretaker, either by the relative or by other persons, has been evaluated as an appropriate placement resource.

(2) An agency or entity that receives state assistance and is involved in foster care placements shall not do either of the following:

(A) Deny a person the opportunity to become a foster parent on the basis of the race, color, or national origin of the person or the child involved.

(B) Delay or deny the placement of a child
 into foster care on the basis of the race, color, or national origin of the foster parent or the child involved.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not affect the application of the Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.).

(c) This section does not preclude a search for an appropriate relative being conducted simultaneously with a search for a foster family.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 845, Sec. 1.   (AB 2929)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7951.

This part does not apply in determining the foster care setting in which the child may be placed for a period not intended to exceed 30 days.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 884, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

7952.

A minor 10 years of age or older being considered for placement in a foster home has the right to make a brief statement to the court making a decision on placement. The court may disregard any preferences expressed by the minor. The minor’s right to make a statement is not limited to the initial placement, but continues for any proceedings concerning continued placement or a decision to return to parental custody.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 884, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 7. SURROGACY AND DONOR FACILITATORS, ASSISTED REPRODUCTION AGREEMENTS FOR GESTATIONAL CARRIERS, AND OOCYTE DONATIONS [7960. - 7962.]

7960.

For purposes of this part, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Assisted reproduction agreement” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 7606.

(b) “Fund management agreement” means the agreement between the intended parents and the surrogacy or donor facilitator relating to the fee or other valuable consideration for services rendered or that will be rendered by the surrogacy or donor facilitator.

(c) “Intended parent” means an individual, married or unmarried, who manifests the intent to be legally bound as the parent of a child
 resulting from assisted reproduction.

(d) “Nonattorney surrogacy or donor facilitator” means a surrogacy or donor practitioner who is not an attorney in good standing licensed to practice law in this state.

(e) “Surrogacy or donor facilitator” means a person or organization that engages in either of the following activities:

(1) Advertising for the purpose of soliciting parties to an assisted reproduction agreement or for the donation of oocytes for use by a person other than the provider of the oocytes, or acting as an intermediary between the parties to an assisted reproduction agreement or oocyte donation.

(2) Charging a fee or other valuable consideration for
 services rendered relating to an assisted reproduction agreement or oocyte donation.

(f) “Surrogate” means a woman who bears and carries a child for another through medically assisted reproduction and pursuant to a written agreement, as set forth in Sections 7606 and 7962. Within the definition of surrogate are two different and distinct types:

(1) “Traditional surrogate” means a woman who agrees to gestate an embryo, in which the woman is the gamete donor and the embryo was created using the sperm of the intended father or a donor arranged by the intended parent or parents.

(2) “Gestational carrier” means a woman who is not an intended parent and who agrees to gestate a genetically unrelated embryo
 pursuant to an assisted reproduction agreement.

(g) “Donor” means a woman who provides oocytes for use by another for the purpose of assisting the recipient of the oocytes in having a child or children.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 107.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7961.

(a) A nonattorney surrogacy or donor facilitator shall direct the client to deposit all client funds into either of the following:

(1) An independent, bonded escrow depository maintained by a licensed, independent, bonded escrow company.

(2) A trust account maintained by an attorney.

(b) For purposes of this section, a nonattorney surrogacy or donor facilitator may not have a financial interest in any escrow company holding client funds. A nonattorney surrogacy or donor facilitator and any of its directors or employees shall not be an agent of any escrow
 company holding client funds.

(c) Client funds may only be disbursed by the attorney or escrow agent as set forth in the assisted reproduction agreement and fund management agreement.

(d) This section shall not apply to funds that are both of the following:

(1) Not provided for in the fund management agreement.

(2) Paid directly to a medical doctor for medical services or a psychologist for psychological services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 91, Sec. 4.   (AB 1049)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7962.

(a) An assisted reproduction agreement for gestational carriers shall contain, but shall not be limited to, all of the following information:

(1) The date on which the assisted reproduction agreement for gestational carriers was executed.

(2) The persons from which the gametes originated, unless donated gametes were used, in which case the assisted reproduction agreement does not need to specify the name of the donor but shall specify whether the donated gamete or gametes were eggs, sperm, or embryos, or all.

(3) The identity of the intended parent or
 parents.

(4) Disclosure of how the intended parents will cover the medical expenses of the gestational carrier and of the newborn or newborns. If health care coverage is used to cover those medical expenses, the disclosure shall include a review of the health care policy provisions related to coverage for surrogate pregnancy, including any possible liability of the gestational carrier, third-party liability liens or other insurance coverage, and any notice requirements that could affect coverage or liability of the gestational carrier. The review and disclosure do not constitute legal advice. If coverage of liability is uncertain, a statement of that fact shall be sufficient to meet the requirements of this section.

(b) Prior to executing the written assisted reproduction agreement
 for gestational carriers, a surrogate and the intended parent or intended parents shall be represented by separate independent licensed attorneys of their choosing.

(c) The assisted reproduction agreement for gestational carriers shall be executed by the parties and the signatures on the assisted reproduction agreement for gestational carriers shall be notarized or witnessed by an equivalent method of affirmation as required in the jurisdiction where the assisted reproduction agreement for gestational carriers is executed.

(d) The parties to an assisted reproduction agreement for gestational carriers shall not undergo an embryo transfer procedure, or commence injectable medication in preparation for an embryo transfer for assisted reproduction purposes, until the assisted reproduction
 agreement for gestational carriers has been fully executed as required by subdivisions (b) and (c) of this section.

(e) An action to establish the parent and child relationship between the intended parent or parents and the child as to a child conceived pursuant to an assisted reproduction agreement for gestational carriers may be filed before the child’s birth and may be filed in the county where the child is anticipated to be born, the county where the intended parent or intended parents reside, the county where the surrogate resides, the county where the assisted reproduction agreement for gestational carriers is executed, or the county where medical procedures pursuant to the agreement are to be performed. A copy of the assisted reproduction agreement for gestational carriers shall be lodged in the court action filed for the purpose of
 establishing the parent and child relationship. The parties to the assisted reproduction agreement for gestational carriers shall attest, under penalty of perjury, and to the best of their knowledge and belief, as to the parties’ compliance with this section in entering into the assisted reproduction agreement for gestational carriers. Submitting those declarations shall not constitute a waiver, under Section 912 of the Evidence Code, of the lawyer-client privilege described in Article 3 (commencing with Section 950) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code.

(f) (1) A notarized assisted reproduction agreement for gestational carriers signed by all the parties, with the attached declarations of independent attorneys, and lodged with the superior court in accordance with this section, shall rebut any presumptions
 contained within Part 2 (commencing with Section 7540), subdivision (a) of Section 7610, and Sections 7611 and 7613, as to the gestational carrier surrogate, or the gestational carrier surrogate’s spouse or partner, being a parent of the child or children.

(2) Upon petition of any party to a properly executed assisted reproduction agreement for gestational carriers, the court shall issue a judgment or order establishing a parent and child relationship, whether pursuant to Section 7630 or otherwise. The judgment or order may be issued before or after the child’s or children’s birth subject to the limitations of Section 7633. Subject to proof of compliance with this section, the judgment or order shall establish the parent and child relationship of the intended parent or intended parents identified in the surrogacy agreement and
 shall establish that the surrogate, and the surrogate’s spouse or partner, is not a parent of, and has no parental rights or duties with respect to, the child or children. The judgment or order shall be issued forthwith and without further hearing or evidence, unless the court or a party to the assisted reproduction agreement for gestational carriers has a good faith, reasonable belief that the assisted reproduction agreement for gestational carriers or attorney declarations were not executed in accordance with this section. Upon motion by a party to the assisted reproduction agreement for gestational carriers, the matter shall be scheduled for hearing before a judgment or order is issued. This section does not prevent a court from finding and declaring that the intended parent is, or intended parents are, the parent or parents of the child where compliance with this section has not been met; however, the
 court shall require sufficient proof entitling the parties to the relief sought.

(g) The petition, relinquishment or consent, agreement, order, report to the court from any investigating agency, and any power of attorney and deposition filed in the office of the clerk of the court pursuant to this part shall not be open to inspection by any person other than the parties to the proceeding and their attorneys and the State Department of Social Services, except upon the written authority of a judge of the superior court. A judge of the superior court shall not authorize anyone to inspect the petition, relinquishment or consent, agreement, order, report to the court from any investigating agency, or power of attorney or deposition, or any portion of those documents, except in exceptional circumstances and where necessary. The petitioner
 may be required to pay the expense of preparing the copies of the documents to be inspected.

(h) Upon the written request of any party to the proceeding and the order of any judge of the superior court, the clerk of the court shall not provide any documents referred to in subdivision (g) for inspection or copying to any other person, unless the name of the gestational carrier or any information tending to identify the gestational carrier is deleted from the documents or copies thereof.

(i) An assisted reproduction agreement for gestational carriers executed in accordance with this section is presumptively valid and shall not be rescinded or revoked without a court order. For purposes of this part, any failure to comply with the requirements of this section shall rebut the
 presumption of the validity of the assisted reproduction agreement for gestational carriers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 108.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 13. ADOPTION [8500. - 9340.]



PART 1. DEFINITIONS [8500. - 8548.]

8500.

Unless the provision or context otherwise requires, the definitions in this part govern the construction of this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8502.

(a) “Adoption service provider” means any of the following:

(1) A licensed private adoption agency.

(2) An individual who has presented satisfactory evidence to the department that the individual is a licensed clinical social worker who also has a minimum of five years of experience providing professional social work services while employed by a licensed California adoption agency or the department.

(3) In a state other than California, or a country other than the United States, an adoption agency licensed or otherwise approved under the laws of that state or
 country, or an individual who is licensed or otherwise certified as a clinical social worker under the laws of that state or country.

(4) An individual who has presented satisfactory evidence to the department that the individual is a licensed marriage and family therapist who has a minimum of five years of experience providing professional adoption casework services while employed by a licensed California adoption agency or the department. The department shall review the qualifications of each individual to determine if the individual has performed professional adoption casework services for five years as required by this section while employed by a licensed California adoption agency or the department.

(5) An individual who has presented satisfactory evidence to the
 department that the individual is a licensed professional clinical counselor who has a minimum of five years’ experience providing professional adoption casework services while employed by a licensed California adoption agency or the department. The department shall review the credentials of each individual to determine if the individual has performed professional adoption casework services as required by this paragraph.

(b) If, in the case of a birth parent located in California, at least three adoption service providers are not reasonably available, or, in the case of a birth parent located outside of California or outside of the United States who has contacted at least three potential adoption service providers and been unsuccessful in obtaining the services of an adoption service provider who is reasonably available and willing to provide
 services, independent legal counsel for the birth parent may serve as an adoption service provider pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 8801.5. “Reasonably available” means that an adoption service provider is all of the following:

(1) Available within five days for an advisement of rights pursuant to Section 8801.5, or within 24 hours for the signing of the placement agreement pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 8801.3.

(2) Within 100 miles of the birth mother.

(3) Available for a cost not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) to make an advisement of rights and to witness the signing of the placement agreement.

(c) If an attorney acts
 as an adoption service provider, the fee to make an advisement of rights and to witness the signing of the placement agreement shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 109.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

8503.

“Adoptive parent” means a person who has obtained an order of adoption of a minor child or, in the case of an adult adoption, an adult.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8506.

“Agency adoption” means the adoption of a minor, other than an intercountry adoption, in which the department, county adoption agency, or licensed adoption agency is a party to, or joins in, the adoption petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 35, Sec. 2.   (SB 1013)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8509.

“Applicant” means a person who has submitted a written application to adopt a child from the department, county adoption agency, or licensed adoption agency and who is being considered by the adoption agency for the adoptive placement of a child.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 35, Sec. 3.   (SB 1013)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8512.

“Birth parent” means the biological parent or, in the case of a person previously adopted, the adoptive parent.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8513.

“County adoption agency” means an adoption agency operated by a county or consortium of counties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 35, Sec. 4.   (SB 1013)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8514.

“Days” means calendar days, unless otherwise specified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 585, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

8515.

“Delegated county adoption agency” means a county adoption agency that has agreed to provide the services described in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 8800) of Part 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 35, Sec. 5.   (SB 1013)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8518.

“Department” means the State Department of Social Services.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8521.

(a) “Full-service adoption agency” means a licensed or authorized entity engaged in the business of providing adoption services, that does all of the following:

(1) Assumes care, custody, and control of a child through relinquishment of the child to the agency or involuntary termination of parental rights to the child.

(2) Assesses the birth parents, prospective adoptive parents, or child.

(3) Places children for adoption.

(4) Supervises adoptive placements.

(5) Recruits prospective adoptive parents, locates children for adoption, or acts as an intermediary between the parties to an adoption.

(b) Private full-service adoption agencies shall be organized and operated on a nonprofit basis. As a condition of licensure to provide intercountry adoption services, a private full-service adoption agency shall be accredited by the Council on Accreditation, or supervised by an accredited primary provider, or acting as an exempted provider, in compliance with Subpart F (commencing with Section 96.29) of Part 96 of Title 22 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 43, Sec. 2.   (AB 120)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

8524.

“Independent adoption” means the adoption of a child in which neither the department, county adoption agency, nor agency licensed by the department is a party to, or joins in, the adoption petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 35, Sec. 7.   (SB 1013)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8527.

“Intercountry adoption” means the adoption of a foreign-born child for whom federal law makes a special immigration visa available. Intercountry adoption includes completion of the adoption in the child’s native country or completion of the adoption in this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8530.

“Licensed adoption agency” means any agency licensed by the department to provide the adoption services specified in paragraphs (9) and (10) of subdivision (a) of Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 43, Sec. 3.   (AB 120)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

8533.

(a) “Noncustodial adoption agency” means any licensed entity engaged in the business of providing adoption services, which does all of the following:

(1) Assesses the prospective adoptive parents.

(2) Cooperatively matches children freed for adoption, who are under the care, custody, and control of a licensed adoption agency, for adoption, with assessed and approved prospective adoptive parents.

(3) Cooperatively supervises adoptive placements with a full-service adoption agency, but does not disrupt a placement or remove a child from a placement.

(4) Recruits prospective adoptive parents, locates children for an adoption, or acts as an intermediary between the parties to an adoption.

(b) Private noncustodial adoption agencies shall be organized and operated on a nonprofit basis. As a condition of licensure to provide intercountry adoption services, a noncustodial adoption agency shall be accredited by the Council on Accreditation, or supervised by an accredited primary provider, or acting as an exempted provider, in compliance with Subpart F (commencing with Section 96.29) of Part 96 of Title 22 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 43, Sec. 4.   (AB 120)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

8539.

“Place for adoption” means, in the case of an independent adoption, the selection of a prospective adoptive parent or parents for a child by the birth parent or parents and the completion of an adoptive placement agreement on a form prescribed by the department by the birth parent or parents placing the child with prospective adoptive parents.

This section shall become operative on January 1, 1995.

(History: Repealed (Jan. 1, 1994) and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 758, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Section operative January 1, 1995, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8542.

“Prospective adoptive parent” means a person who has filed or intends to file a petition under Part 2 (commencing with Section 8600) to adopt a child who has been or who is to be placed in the person’s physical care or a petition under Part 3 (commencing with Section 9300) to adopt an adult.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8543.

“Qualified court investigator” means a superior court investigator with the same minimum qualifications as a probation officer or county welfare worker designated to conduct stepparent adoption investigations in stepparent adoption proceedings and proceedings to declare a minor free from parental custody and control.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 185.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8545.

“Special needs child” means a child for whom all of the following are true:

(a) It has been determined that the child cannot or should not be returned to the parent’s home, as evidenced by a petition for termination of parental rights, a court order terminating parental rights, or a signed relinquishment.

(b) The child has at least one of the following characteristics that is a barrier to adoption:

(1) Adoptive placement without financial assistance is unlikely because of membership in a sibling group that should remain intact, or by virtue of race, ethnicity, color, language, age of
 three years or older, or parental background of a medical or behavioral nature that can be determined to adversely affect the development of the child.

(2) Adoptive placement without financial assistance is unlikely because the child has a mental, physical, emotional, or medical disability that has been certified by a licensed professional competent to make an assessment and operating within the scope of that person’s profession. This paragraph shall also apply to children with a developmental disability as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 4512 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, including those determined to require out-of-home nonmedical care as described in Section 11464 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(c) The need for adoption subsidy is evidenced by an unsuccessful
 search for an adoptive home to take the child without financial assistance, as documented in the case file of the prospective adoptive child. The requirement for this search shall be waived when it would be against the best interest of the child because of the existence of significant emotional ties with prospective adoptive parents while in the care of these persons as a foster child.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 110.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

8548.

“Stepparent adoption” means an adoption of a child by a stepparent where one birth parent retains custody and control of the child.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. ADOPTION OF UNMARRIED MINORS [8600. - 9212.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [8600. - 8626.]

8600.

An unmarried minor may be adopted by an adult as provided in this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8600.5.

Tribal customary adoption as defined in Section 366.24 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and as applied to Indian Children who are dependents of the court, does not apply to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 35, Sec. 9.   (SB 1013)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8601.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), a prospective adoptive parent or parents shall be at least 10 years older than the child.

(b) If the court is satisfied that the adoption of a child by a stepparent, or by a sister, brother, aunt, uncle, or first cousin and, if that person is married, by that person and that person’s spouse, is in the best interest of the parties and is in the public interest, it may approve the adoption without regard to the ages of the child and the prospective adoptive parent or parents.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8601.5.

(a) A court may issue an order of adoption and declare that it shall be entered nunc pro tunc when it will serve public policy and the best interests of the child, such as cases where adoption finalization has been delayed beyond the child’s 18th birthday due to factors beyond the control of the prospective adoptive family and the proposed adoptee.

(b) The request for nunc pro tunc entry of the order shall be stated in the adoption request or an amendment thereto, and shall set forth specific facts in support thereof.

(c) To the extent that a child’s eligibility for any publicly funded benefit program is or could be altered by the entry of
 an order of adoption, the change in eligibility shall not be determined as of the nunc pro tunc date, but shall be determined as of the date of the adoption finalization hearing.

(d) The nunc pro tunc date shall not precede the date upon which the parental rights of the birth parent or parents were initially terminated, whether voluntarily or involuntarily.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 462, Sec. 6.   (AB 687)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8602.

The consent of a child, if over the age of 12 years, is necessary to the child’s adoption.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8603.
